Utah statutes.
53-2-504.   Withdrawal from the statewide mutual aid system.

A county, municipality, public safety district, or public safety interlocal entity may withdraw from the statewide mutual aid system by:

(1)  enacting a resolution declaring that it elects not to participate in the system; and

(2)  delivering a copy of the resolution to the director.

